New York, session 2025-2026, A7875.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "no toxics 2 tent act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 3-a of section 500 of the general business law, as 4 added by chapter 318 of the laws of 1978, is amended to read as follows: 5 3-a. "Portable temporary shelter" shall include but shall not be 6 limited to[,] any type of tent[, fold-out or pop-up camping or tent 7 trailer, recreational vehicle awning or add-on room or shelter, or 8 screen house] made in whole, or in part of fabric or related material 9 and defined as a place of assemblage in or under which fifteen or more 10 persons may gather. This subdivision shall not apply to tents designed 11 or manufactured for children's play, camping, backpacking, or mountai- 12 neering, provided that such tents are constructed with fabric made 13 entirely from synthetic fibers. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11284-02-5